Maryland, session 2025, HB0062.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
7–239.1.
(a) In §§ 7–239.1 through 7–239.4 of this subtitle the following words have the
meanings indicated.
(b) (1) “Chemical warfare material” means any of the following:
(i) Adamsite (Phenarsazine chloride);
(ii) GA (Ethyl–N, N–dimethyl phosphoramidocyanidate);
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0062*

HOUSE BILL 62
(iii) GB (Isopropyl methyl phosphonofluoridate);
(iv) GD (Pinacolyl methylphosphonofluoridate);
(v) H, HD (Bis(2–chloroethyl) sulfide);
(vi) HT (60 percent HD and 40 percent T
(Bis[2(2–chloroethyl– thio)ethyl]ester));
(vii) L (Dichloro(2–chlorovinyl)arsine);
(viii) T (2–2’ Di (3–chloroethylthio)–diethyl ether); or
(ix) VX (O–ethyl–S–(2–diisopropylaminoethyl) methyl
phosphonothiolate).
(2) “Chemical warfare material” includes any substance that has chemical
warfare material as an active or principal ingredient or ingredients, and degradation
products of chemical warfare material.
(c) (1) “Monitoring data” means data from actual stack emissions under all
operating conditions at a controlled hazardous substance facility.
(2) “Monitoring data” does not include trial burn data or data derived from
incineration of agent simulants.
(D) “RESEARCH FACILITY” MEANS A FACILITY DESIGNATED BY THE U.S.
DEPARTMENT OF DEFENSE FOR THE RESEARCH, DEVELOPMENT, AND
DEMONSTRATION OF TECHNOLOGIES RELATED TO CHEMICAL WARFARE
MATERIALS.
7–239.2.
(a) The State of Maryland finds that the chemical warfare materials specified
under § 7–239.1 of this subtitle were designed for warfare, specifically the destruction of
human beings, and for no legitimate civilian industrial use.
(b) The State recognizes the need to dispose of these chemical warfare materials
as safely as possible, ensuring the health and safety of State residents by the regulation of
their release into the environment.
(c) Since these chemical warfare materials are highly toxic or carcinogenic, in
addition to any other applicable requirements at law, the State shall require [without
exemption or waiver] that an applicant for the treatment by incineration of chemical

HOUSE BILL 62 3
warfare materials shall comply with all [the] APPLICABLE requirements of this subtitle
and all APPLICABLE regulations adopted under this subtitle.
(D) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION OR IN §§ 7–239.3 AND 7–239.4 OF THIS
SUBTITLE SHALL LIMIT THE AUTHORITY OF THE DEPARTMENT TO APPLY
REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE TO A CHEMICAL WARFARE
MATERIAL THAT IS A CONTROLLED HAZARDOUS SUBSTANCE.
7–239.3.
(A) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO THE INCINERATION OF CHEMICAL
WARFARE MATERIALS AT A RESEARCH FACILITY IF THE INCINERATION IS DONE FOR
RESEARCH, DEVELOPMENT, OR DEMONSTRATION PURPOSES.
[(a)] (B) A chemical warfare material that is a solid waste is a controlled
hazardous substance.
[(b)] (C) In addition to any other applicable requirements, the Department may
not issue a permit for the construction, material alteration, or operation of a controlled
hazardous substance facility to be used for the treatment by incineration of a chemical
warfare material unless:
(1) The permit applicant demonstrates to the satisfaction of the
Department prior to issuance of a controlled hazardous substance facility permit:
(i) That the proposed incinerator technology has consistently met
all applicable federal and State performance standards in an operational facility
comparable to the proposed facility for a period of time and under conditions acceptable to
the Department;
(ii) That emissions and monitoring data from a comparable facility
demonstrate compliance with State toxic air pollutant standards established under Title 2
of this article;
(iii) That a destruction and removal efficiency of 99.9999 percent is
achievable for each chemical warfare material to be incinerated at the facility;
(iv) That the applicant has made adequate provision to support and
fund the development of a plan that demonstrates the capability of removing, sheltering,
and protecting persons from the largest area at risk from a worst–case release, as defined
by the Department;
(v) That an emergency preparedness plan has been developed with
adequate public participation that provides training, coordination, and equipment
necessary for State and local emergency response personnel and community members to
respond to a release of a chemical warfare material from the proposed facility; and

HOUSE BILL 62
(vi) That the emergency preparedness plan has been presented at
public meetings in each county potentially impacted by a worst–case release;
(2) The Department finds that the applicant has fully evaluated all
reasonable alternative methods for treatment or disposal including transport to a less
populated disposal site in order to create less risk of release or harm to the general public
or the environment; and
(3) The local governing body of each county and municipal corporation
included in the worst–case release has a reasonable opportunity to review and provide
comment on the facility permit application and the emergency preparedness plan under
paragraph (1)(v) of this subsection.
7–239.4.
(A) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO THE INCINERATION OF CHEMICAL
WARFARE MATERIALS AT A RESEARCH FACILITY IF THE INCINERATION IS DONE FOR
RESEARCH, DEVELOPMENT, OR DEMONSTRATION PURPOSES.
[(a)] (B) The Department shall require as conditions of operation of a controlled
hazardous substance facility to be used for the treatment by incineration of a chemical
warfare material that:
(1) Treatment by incineration be monitored on a continuous basis;
(2) Monitoring data be regularly reviewed by a qualified independent third
party selected by the Department; and
(3) Monitoring data and reviews be reported to the Department in the
manner and frequency determined appropriate by the Department.
[(b)] (C) Any permit issued under this section shall be for a quantity that is
specifically identified and:
(1) May be renewed for good cause as to the length of time for completion
of the incineration authorized under the permit; but
(2) May not be modified as to the amount of controlled hazardous substance
to be destroyed.
[(c)] (D) After destruction of the specific quantity of the controlled hazardous
substance allowed by the terms of the permit issued under this section, the incinerator shall
be disassembled and disposed of in accordance with all applicable federal and State
performance standards and in a time period established by the permit.

HOUSE BILL 62 5
[(d)] (E) In addition to the facility permit fee required under § 7–237 of this
subtitle, the applicant shall pay the compensation of an independent third party with whom
the Department may contract for the review of application materials and monitoring data.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.